New York, session 2025-2026, A8245.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 227-f of the real property law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. (a) Any potential tenant injured by reason of a violation of subdi- 4 vision one of this section may bring an action in the supreme court for 5 temporary and permanent injunctive relief and for damages together with 6 the costs of the action, including reasonable attorney's fees. 7 (b) An action under this subdivision may be brought within two years 8 of when a tenant should reasonably have discovered a violation and may 9 be brought against the landlord or their agent or employee or any other 10 person charged or authorized to lease the relevant residential premise. 11 (c) A person may commence an action under this subdivision whether or 12 not they have reported the violation to the attorney general. 13 (d) The commencement of an action under this subdivision shall not 14 preclude the attorney general from bringing an action under subdivision 15 two of this section for injunctive relief and the recovery of civil 16 penalties. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11871-01-5